Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-539
Legislative intent.

It
is the intent of the Legislature that sections 71-539 to 71-544 provide for
the exchange of immunization information between health care professionals, health care
facilities, health care services, schools, postsecondary educational institutions,
licensed child care facilities, electronic health-record systems, public health
departments, health departments of other states, Indian health services, and
tribes for the purpose of protecting the public health by facilitating
age-appropriate immunizations which will minimize the risk of outbreak of vaccine-preventable diseases.

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 11;

Laws 2011, LB591, § 6.